District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-3915

Overpayment; credit or refund; time for filing; interest.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 20, 1989, D.C. Law 8-26, § 16, 36 DCR 4723
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(fff)(2), 48 DCR 334

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-3915.

Editor's Notes

Section 410(d) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(a), (c), (j), (m), (p), (q), (s), (w), (bb), (dd), (ee), (hh) through (kk), (mm) through (oo), (qq) through (uu), (yy), (zz), (bbb), (ddd), and (fff) shall apply for all tax years or taxable periods beginning after December 31, 2000.”